Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-304
Commission; rules and regulations; commission orders.

(1) The commission
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, under the procedures set forth
in the Administrative Procedure Act, governing the administration and use
of all property, real and personal, under its ownership or control.

(2) The commission shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations it deems necessary to administer the
activities and facilities described in sections 37-305 to 37-313.

(3) The commission may
pass, by majority vote, commission orders which govern (a) conservation orders,
(b) seasons, (c) open and closed areas, and (d) bag limits as described in
section 37-314.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 62;

Laws 2013, LB499, § 1.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.